Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201879-8,137.03
Enhancing Excellence in Teaching Program; administration; eligible student; loans.

(1) The department shall administer the Enhancing Excellence in Teaching Program either directly or by contracting with public or private entities.

(2) To be eligible for the program, an eligible student shall:

(a) Agree to complete an eligible graduate program at an eligible institution and to complete the program on which the applicant's eligibility is based as determined by the department; and

(b) Commit to teach in an accredited or approved public or private school in Nebraska upon successful completion of the eligible graduate program for which the applicant is applying to the Enhancing Excellence in Teaching Program and to maintaining certification pursuant to sections 79-806 to 79-815.

(3) Eligible students may apply on an annual basis for loans in an amount of not more than one hundred seventy-five dollars per credit hour. Loans awarded to individual students shall not exceed a cumulative period exceeding five consecutive years. Loans shall only be awarded through the department. Loans shall be funded pursuant to section 79-8,137.05.

Laws 2009, LB547, § 10;

Laws 2010, LB1071, § 10;

Laws 2015, LB519, § 7;

Laws 2016, LB1066, § 14.